Louisiana, session 2026, HB489.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:1711, 1711.2(A), 1711.4, and 1711.6(C) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1711. Findings; purpose; Definitions definitions
A. The legislature finds that:
(1) The law of this state authorizes payable-on-death or transfer-on-death
beneficiary designations for bank accounts, credit unions, savings associations, life
insurance, and retirement accounts.
(2) Investment and brokerage accounts often represent a significant portion
of a family's non-retirement assets.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-563 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 489
(3) Lack of clarity regarding transfer-on-death registration for securities has
resulted in frozen accounts, unnecessary probate delays, exposure to market risk, and
financial hardship for the families of this state.
(4) Clarification is necessary to ensure consistent implementation while
preserving this state's succession, community property, and forced heirship
principles.
B. The legislature intends this Chapter to recognize and require
implementation of transfer-on-death registration for individually-owned securities,
brokerage accounts holding securities, and accounts maintained by broker-dealers,
custodians, transfer agents, financial advisors, and investment advisors, and similar
fiduciaries.
C. In this Chapter, the following definitions shall apply unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Beneficiary form" means a registration of a security that indicates the
present owner or co-owners of the security and the designation of the person in
whose name the security is to be registered upon the death of the owner or co-owner.
(2) "Good faith" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 10:1-201.
(3) "Registering entity" means a person who originates or transfers a security
title by registration, and includes a broker, custodian, financial advisor, or similarly-
situated fiduciary maintaining security accounts for customers and a transfer agent
or other person acting for or as an issuer of securities.
(4) "Security" means a share, participation, or other interest in movable
property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other issuer, and
includes a certificated security, an uncertificated security, and a security account.
It shall not include a share, participation, or other interest in immovable property.
(5) "Security account" means the following:
(a) A reinvestment account associated with a security, a securities account
with a broker, a cash balance in a brokerage account, cash, interest, earnings, or
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-563 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 489
dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a reinvestment account, or
a brokerage account, whether or not credited to the account before the owner's death.
(b) A cash balance or other property held for or due to the owner of a
security as a replacement for or product of an account security, whether or not
credited to the account before the owner's death.
(6) "State" includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the
legislative authority of the United States.
* * *
§1711.2. Registration in beneficiary form; applicable law
A. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, A a security may
shall be registered in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by this or a similar
statute of the state of organization of the issuer or registering entity, the location of
the registering entity's principal office, the office of its transfer agent or its office
making the registration, or by this or a similar statute of the law of the state listed as
the owner's address at the time of registration. A registration governed by the law of
a jurisdiction in which this or similar legislation is not in force or was not in force
when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless presumed to be
valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.
* * *
§1711.4. Effect of registration in beneficiary form
A registration of a security in beneficiary form does not constitute a donation
inter vivos or mortis causa. A registration of a security in beneficiary form acts as
a method of transfer subject to existing law and does not alter substantive rights
related to community property or forced heirship. A registration of a security in
beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or by
any of the surviving owners without the consent of the beneficiary.
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-563 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 489
§1711.6. Registering entity
* * *
C.(1) A registering entity shall not be held liable and is discharged from all
claims to a security by the estate, surviving spouse, creditors, heirs, legatees, or
forced heirs of a deceased owner if it registers a transfer of the security in accordance
with this Chapter and does so in good faith reliance on the registration in beneficiary
form, on this Chapter, and on information provided to it by affidavit of the
succession representative of the deceased owner, or by the surviving beneficiary or
by the surviving beneficiary's representatives.
(2) A registering entity shall not be held liable for failure to do any of the
following:
(a) Investigate succession disputes.
(b) Determine heirship or forced heirship rights.
(c) Resolve community property claims.
(3) The protections of this Chapter do not extend to a registration or payment
made after a registering entity has received written notice from any claimant to any
interest in the security objecting to implementation of a registration in beneficiary
form. No other notice or information available to the registering entity affects its
right to protection under this Chapter.
* * *
Section 2. It is the intent of this legislature that Chapter 4 of Code Title I of Code
Book III of Title 9 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 be interpreted in the same
manner as and in accordance with similar transfer-on-death provisions of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, including but not limited to accounts with banks as provided in
R.S. 6:314, with savings associations as provided in R.S. 6:766.1, and with credit unions as
provided in R.S. 6:653.1.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-563 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 489
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.